Utah statutes.
65A-9-3.   Authority of division to control noxious weeds, plant species,
and insects.
The division may enter into cooperative agreements with other public agencies
and private landowners for the control of noxious weeds, new and invading
plant species, insects, and disease infestations on state-owned and adjacent
lands.
